Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Arts and Crafts

152.410.
Declaration of policy. [Repealed.]

152.420.
Definitions for KRS 152.410 to 152.470. [Repealed.]

152.430.
Arts and Craft Loan Fund Board — Powers. [Repealed.]

152.440.
Application for loan — Action of board. [Repealed.]

152.450.
Regulations governing loans. [Repealed.]

152.460.
Revolving fund. [Repealed.]

152.470.
Acceptance of aid for promotion of arts and crafts industry. [Repealed.]

152.480.
Division of Arts and Crafts. [Repealed.]

152.490.
Kentucky film commission established — Members — Responsibilities. [Repealed.]